Utah statutes.
63J-1-506.   Parking fees at court buildings.
(1)  State-owned or leased court facilities may not charge or collect fees for
parking without prior approval by the Legislature.
(2)  The Legislature may approve, increase, decrease and approve, or reject
any parking fee submitted to it by the courts.
